Maryland, session 2026, SB0078.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0078*

SENATE BILL 78
Article – Health – General
SUBTITLE 8. PROSTATE–SPECIFIC ANTIGEN TESTING.
17–801.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANING
INDICATED.
(B) “CLINICAL LABORATORY” MEANS A FACILITY IN WHICH LABORATORY
TESTING IS PERFORMED ON HUMAN SPECIMENS FOR DIAGNOSIS, PREVENTION, OR
TREATMENT OF DISEASE.
(C) “PROSTATE–SPECIFIC ANTIGEN TEST” MEANS A LABORATORY BLOOD
TEST THAT MEASURES THE CONCENTRATION OF PROSTATE–SPECIFIC ANTIGEN FOR
USE IN DIAGNOSING A PROSTATE DISORDER.
17–802.
(A) IF A PROVIDER ORDERS A PROSTATE–SPECIFIC ANTIGEN TEST FOR A
PATIENT DURING A PATIENT ENCOUNTER, THE PROVIDER SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN
INFORMATION TO THE PATIENT RELATING TO THE NECESSARY PREPARATION FOR
ENSURING ACCURATE TEST RESULTS.
(B) IF A CLINICAL LABORATORY OFFERS PROSTATE–SPECIFIC ANTIGEN
TESTING WITHOUT A PROVIDER ORDER FROM A PATIENT ENCOUNTER, THE
LABORATORY IN WHICH BLOOD IS DRAWN FOR THE TEST SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN
INFORMATION TO THE PATIENT RELATING TO THE NECESSARY PREPARATION FOR
ENSURING ACCURATE TEST RESULTS THAT SHALL ALSO BE MADE:
(1) NOT LATER THAN 3 DAYS BEFORE A SCHEDULED APPOINTMENT;
AND
(2) AVAILABLE THROUGH IN–PERSON EDUCATION.
17–803.
A CLINICAL LABORATORY ADMINISTERING A PROSTATE–SPECIFIC ANTIGEN
TEST SHALL:
(1) USE TESTING ASSAYS THAT HAVE BEEN APPROVED BY THE U.S.
FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION;

SENATE BILL 78 3
(2) IMPLEMENT CALIBRATION OF PROSTATE–SPECIFIC ANTIGEN
TEST ASSAYS USING WORLD HEALTH ORGANIZATION INTERNATIONAL STANDARDS
OR ANOTHER NATIONALLY RECOGNIZED REFERENCE STANDARD;
(3) REPORT PROSTATE–SPECIFIC ANTIGEN TEST RESULTS IN
NANOGRAMS PER MILLILITER AND INCLUDE ANY REFERENCE RANGE UNIQUE TO
THE TESTING ASSAY USED;
(4) DOCUMENT AND DISCLOSE TO THE ORDERING PROVIDER THE
TEST METHODOLOGY, MANUFACTURER, AND LOT NUMBER OF THE TESTING ASSAY
USED; AND
(5) PARTICIPATE IN A CLINICAL TESTING PROFICIENCY PROGRAM
RELATING TO PROSTATE–SPECIFIC ANTIGEN TESTS THAT IS RECOGNIZED BY THE
CLINICAL LABORATORY IMPROVEMENT AMENDMENTS OR THE COLLEGE OF
AMERICAN PATHOLOGISTS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.